Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3620
Board; removal of member; grounds.

A member of the board shall be removable by the Governor for cause. The member shall first be given a copy of written charges against such member and also an opportunity to be heard publicly. In addition to all other causes, a member ceasing to (1) be a resident of the state, (2) live in the district from which such member was appointed, or (3) be actually engaged in growing corn in the state shall be deemed sufficient cause for removal from office.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 11.